Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-187
Vehicle identification inspections; attendance at training; restriction.

No individual, other than a peace officer, shall attend training for inspections funded under the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund unless such individual has been designated by a sheriff and approved by the patrol.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 87.